Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-373
Report of abuse, neglect, or exploitation; law enforcement
agency; duties.

(1) Upon the receipt of a report concerning
abuse, neglect, or exploitation pursuant
to section 28-372, it shall be the duty of the law enforcement agency (a)
to make an investigation if deemed warranted because of alleged violations
of section 28-386, (b) to take immediate steps, if necessary, to protect the
vulnerable adult, and (c) to institute legal proceedings if appropriate. The
law enforcement agency shall notify the department if an investigation is
undertaken. Such notification shall be made no later than the next working
day following receipt of the report.

(2) The law enforcement agency shall make a written report or a case
summary to the department of all investigated cases of abuse, neglect, or exploitation and action taken
with respect to all such cases.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 26;

Laws 2012, LB1051, § 11.